Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.130

Local jail reports.

Local jails shall report to the office of financial management and that office shall transmit to the department the information on all persons convicted of felonies or incarcerated for noncompliance with a felony sentence who are admitted or released from the jails and shall promptly respond to requests of the department for such data. Information transmitted shall include but not be limited to the state identification number, whether the reason for admission to jail was a felony conviction or noncompliance with a felony sentence, and the dates of the admission and release.

The office of financial management may contract with a state or local governmental agency, or combination thereof, or a private organization for the information collection and transmittal under this section.

[ 1988 c 152 s 1; 1987 c 462 s 3; 1984 c 17 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1987 c 462: See note following RCW 13.04.116.